Utah statutes.
58-24b-302.   Licensure.
(1)  An applicant for a license as a physical therapist shall:
(a)  be of good moral character;
(b)  complete the application process, including payment of fees;
(c)  submit proof of graduation from a professional physical therapist
education program that is accredited by a recognized accreditation agency;
(d)  pass an open-book, take-home Utah Physical Therapy Law and Rule
Examination;
(e)  after complying with Subsection (1)(c), pass a licensing examination;
(f)  be able to read, write, speak, understand, and be understood in the
English language and demonstrate proficiency to the satisfaction of the board
if requested by the board; and
(g)  meet any other requirements established by the division, by rule.
(2)  An applicant for a license as a physical therapist assistant shall:
(a)  be of good moral character;
(b)  complete the application process, including payment of fees set by the
division, in accordance with Section 63J-1-504, to recover the costs of
administering the licensing requirements relating to physical therapist
assistants;
(c)  submit proof of graduation from a physical therapist assistant education
program that is accredited by a recognized accreditation agency;
(d)  pass an open-book, take-home Utah Physical Therapy Law and Rule
Examination;
(e)  after complying with Subsection (2)(c), pass a licensing examination;
(f)  be able to read, write, speak, understand, and be understood in the
English language and demonstrate proficiency to the satisfaction of the board
if requested by the board; and
(g)  meet any other requirements established by the division, by rule.
(3)  An applicant for a license as a physical therapist who is educated
outside of the United States shall:
(a)  be of good moral character;
(b)  complete the application process, including payment of fees; and
(c) (i)  provide satisfactory evidence that the applicant graduated from a
professional physical therapist education program that is accredited by a
recognized accreditation agency; or
(ii) (A)  provide satisfactory evidence that the applicant graduated from a
physical therapist education program that prepares the applicant to engage in
the practice of physical therapy, without restriction;
(B)  provide satisfactory evidence that the education program described in
Subsection (3)(c)(ii)(A) is recognized by the government entity responsible
for recognizing a physical therapist education program in the country where
the program is located; and
(C)  pass a credential evaluation to ensure that the applicant has satisfied
uniform educational requirements;
(d)  pass an open-book, take-home Utah Physical Therapy Law and Rule
Examination;
(e)  after complying with Subsection (3)(c), pass a licensing examination;
(f)  be able to read, write, speak, understand, and be understood in the
English language and demonstrate proficiency to the satisfaction of the board
if requested by the board; and
(g)  meet any other requirements established by the division, by rule.
(4)  The division shall issue a license to a person who holds a current
unrestricted license to practice physical therapy in a state, district, or
territory of the United States of America, other than Utah, if the person:
(a)  is of good moral character;
(b)  completes the application process, including payment of fees;
(c)  passes an open-book, take-home Utah Physical Therapy Law and Rule
Examination; and
(d)  is able to read, write, speak, understand, and be understood in the
English language and demonstrate proficiency to the satisfaction of the board
if requested by the board.
(5) (a)  Notwithstanding Subsection 58-1-307(1)(c), an individual may not
engage in an internship in physical therapy, unless the person is:
(i)  certified by the division; or
(ii)  exempt from licensure under Section 58-24b-304.
(b)  The provisions of Subsection (5)(a) apply, regardless of whether the
individual is participating in the supervised clinical training program for
the purpose of becoming a physical therapist or a physical therapist
assistant.
